Nevada, session 83, SB306.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2.2. Chapter 433B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2.4 to 3, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2.4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2.6. 1. The Division shall establish a task force to
develop recommendations for the creation of a program that
provides housing and other services to children, including, without
limitation, children with an emotional disturbance:
(a) Who are:
(1) Discharged from a treatment facility or division facility;
or
-
*SB306_R3*

– 3 –
(2) Released on parole or discharged from a state facility
for the detention of children; and
(b) Who do not have access to housing because of the inability
of a parent or guardian to accept the child back into the home of
the parent or guardian because of a health or safety risk.
2. The task force shall submit the recommendations
developed pursuant to subsection 1 to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services on or before July 1 of
each even-numbered year.
3. The Administrator shall appoint representatives of the
child welfare, juvenile justice and mental health systems to the
task force.
4. The members of the task force shall serve without
compensation.
5. As used in this section, “state facility for the detention of
children” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 62A.330.
Sec. 2.8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. A public or private inpatient psychiatric treatment
facility that admits a child with an emotional disturbance shall
establish discharge procedures which prohibit the discharge of the
child to a temporary facility.
Sec. 3.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. NRS 433B.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.045 1. “Child with an emotional disturbance” means a
child whose progressive development of personality is interfered
with or arrested by mental disorder so that the child shows
impairment in the capacity expected of the child for his or her age
and endowment for:
[1.] (a) A reasonably accurate perception of the world around
him or her;
[2.] (b) Control of his or her impulses;
[3.] (c) Satisfying and satisfactory relationships with others;
[4.] (d) Learning; or
[5.] (e) Any combination of these factors.
2. The term includes, without limitation, a child with a severe
emotional disturbance.
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. NRS 433B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433B.110 1. The division facilities providing services for the
mental health of children are designated as:
(a) [The Nevada Youth Hospital;
-
*SB306_R3*

– 4 –
(b) The Adolescent Treatment Center;
(c)] Northern Nevada [Children’s Behavioral] Child and
Adolescent Services;
(b) Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility North; and
[(d)] (c) Southern Nevada [Children’s Behavioral] Child and
Adolescent Services.
2. Division facilities established after July 1, 1993, must be
named by the Administrator, subject to the approval of the Director
of the Department.
Sec. 11. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 432B.042.
(c) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(d) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
[(c)] (e) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed
pursuant to chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS
629.031, a clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where
health care is provided.
[(d)] (f) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
-
*SB306_R3*

– 5 –
(I) Interacts with the public; and
(II) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or
child protective services or tasks that expose the person to
comparable dangers;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (g) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
-
*SB306_R3*

– 6 –
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
[(f)] (h) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed
person employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant
to NRS 391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (i) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (j) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(i)] (k) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(j)] (l) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(k)] (m) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(l)] (n) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
-
*SB306_R3*

– 7 –
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
-
*SB306_R3*

– 8 –
Sec. 12. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 432B.042.
(d) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
[(d)] (f) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including,
without limitation, a person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed
in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(I) Interacts with the public; and
(II) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or
child protective services or tasks that expose the person to
comparable dangers;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
-
*SB306_R3*

– 9 –
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 200.471.
[(f)] (h) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed
person employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant
to NRS 391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (i) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (j) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(i)] (k) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying sufficient
pressure to another person to make it difficult or impossible for the
person to breathe, including, without limitation, applying pressure to
the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent or hinder breathing or
reduce the intake of air, or applying any pressure to the neck on
either side of the windpipe, but not the windpipe itself, to stop the
flow of blood to the brain via the carotid arteries.
[(j)] (l) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(k)] (m) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(l)] (n) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(m)] (o) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
-
*SB306_R3*

– 10 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who was performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official
suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is committed by
strangulation; and
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who is performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
-
*SB306_R3*

– 11 –
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 13. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
H
-
*SB306_R3*